Hawaii, session 2026, HB2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that federal defense-related contracting represents a significant share of Hawaii's economy and provides substantial opportunities for local businesses and residents.  The legislature further finds that federal investment in military and defense activities has increased substantially in recent years, with congressional appropriations for defense growing by approximately one billion dollars annually over the past few fiscal years. Consistent with the organization and purpose of the executive branch under chapter 26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, effective coordination among state agencies and between state, federal, and military partners is a core governmental function necessary for the efficient administration of public programs and services.  The military and community relations office serves as the State's central point of coordination on military and defense-related matters.  Strengthening the capacity and effectiveness of this office improves intergovernmental coordination, enhances communication and responsiveness, and supports the effective delivery of public services related to defense activities, workforce development, infrastructure, and community relations. Additionally, Hawaii's strategic location and military presence captures a meaningful portion of federal defense investment, and that defense-related expenditures constitute a significant share of the State's economy relative to other states.  Increasing Hawaii's ability to compete for and perform federal work requires coordinated investments in:  (1) local business readiness and compliance support; (2) workforce education-to-career pathways that lead to job placement; and (3) in-state advanced manufacturing, repair, and sustainment capacity that strengthens the State's industrial base and reduces long lead times for critical parts and services. The legislature further finds that effective workforce and industry development efforts would help align early career training with employer demand, connect individuals to internships and job placements, and track measurable outcomes through periodic reporting.  Strategic coordination is necessary to integrate 12 exposure, early college opportunities, internships, and direct-to-career pathways, and to align workforce development with Hawaii's evolving industrial and defense-related needs. The purpose of this Act is to make an appropriation for the military and community relations office to enhance the State's capacity for intergovernmental coordination and effective administration of defense-related programs, and to strengthen Hawaii's defense-related workforce pathways, local business readiness, and in-state manufacturing and sustainment capacity, thereby improving public service delivery, economic resilience, and the State's ability to capture and retain federal investment. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the military and community relations office to enhance the State's capacity for intergovernmental coordination, communication, and program administration responsibilities related to military and defense activities, workforce development, business readiness, and in-state manufacturing and sustainment capacity. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________